Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4383.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin WEST BROADWAY BUSINESS AND AREA COALITION; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the West Broadway Business and Area Coalition to construct, furnish, and equip the renovation and redevelopment of the current property at 1113 West Broadway in the city of Minneapolis into a multiuse facility. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end